dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX DN Y 80
SFX DN ti l .
SFX DN ti la .
SFX DN ti lo .
SFX DN ti li .
SFX DN rati eru .
SFX DN rati erem .
SFX DN rati ereš .
SFX DN rati ere .
SFX DN rati eremo .
SFX DN rati erete .
SFX DN rati erut .
SFX DN ti h .
SFX DN ti še .
SFX DN ti hmo .
SFX DN ti ste .
SFX DN ti hu .
SFX DN rati eri .
SFX DN rati erimo .
SFX DN rati erite .
SFX DN rati eruči .
SFX DN rati eručego .
SFX DN rati eručemu .
SFX DN rati eručim .
SFX DN rati eručem .
SFX DN rati eručih .
SFX DN rati eručimi .
SFX DN rati eruča .
SFX DN rati eruču .
SFX DN rati eručej .
SFX DN rati eručeju .
SFX DN rati eruče .
SFX DN rati eremy .
SFX DN rati eremogo .
SFX DN rati eremomu .
SFX DN rati eremym .
SFX DN rati eremom .
SFX DN rati eremo .
SFX DN rati erema .
SFX DN rati eremu .
SFX DN rati eremoj .
SFX DN rati eremoju .
SFX DN rati eremi .
SFX DN rati ereme .
SFX DN rati eremyh .
SFX DN rati eremym .
SFX DN rati eremymi .
SFX DN ti vši .
SFX DN ti všego .
SFX DN ti všemu .
SFX DN ti všim .
SFX DN ti všem .
SFX DN ti vših .
SFX DN ti všimi .
SFX DN ti vša .
SFX DN ti všu .
SFX DN ti všej .
SFX DN ti všeju .
SFX DN ti vše .
SFX DN ti ny .
SFX DN ti nogo .
SFX DN ti nomu .
SFX DN ti nym .
SFX DN ti nom .
SFX DN ti ni .
SFX DN ti ne .
SFX DN ti nyh .
SFX DN ti nymi .
SFX DN ti na .
SFX DN ti nu .
SFX DN ti noj .
SFX DN ti noju .
SFX DN ti no .
SFX DN ti nje/xPxE .
SFX DN ti nja/xPxE .
SFX DN ti nju/xPxE .
SFX DN ti njem/xPxE .
SFX DN ti nij/xPxE .
SFX DN ti njam/xPxE .
SFX DN ti njami/xPxE .
SFX DN ti njah/xPxE .

SFX DO Y 9
SFX DO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DO 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX DO ov vi/xPxE .
SFX DO ov ve/xPxE .
SFX DO ov vij/xPxE .
SFX DO ov vah/xPxE .
SFX DO ov vam/xPxE .
SFX DO 0 ju/xPxE .
SFX DO ov vami/xPxE .

SFX DP Y 80
SFX DP ti l .
SFX DP ti la .
SFX DP ti lo .
SFX DP ti li .
SFX DP ati ju .
SFX DP ati jem .
SFX DP ati ješ .
SFX DP ati je .
SFX DP ati jemo .
SFX DP ati jete .
SFX DP ati jut .
SFX DP ti h .
SFX DP ti še .
SFX DP ti hmo .
SFX DP ti ste .
SFX DP ti hu .
SFX DP ati j .
SFX DP ati jmo .
SFX DP ati jte .
SFX DP ati juči .
SFX DP ati jučego .
SFX DP ati jučemu .
SFX DP ati jučim .
SFX DP ati jučem .
SFX DP ati jučih .
SFX DP ati jučimi .
SFX DP ati juča .
SFX DP ati juču .
SFX DP ati jučej .
SFX DP ati jučeju .
SFX DP ati juče .
SFX DP ati jemy .
SFX DP ati jemogo .
SFX DP ati jemomu .
SFX DP ati jemym .
SFX DP ati jemom .
SFX DP ati jemo .
SFX DP ati jema .
SFX DP ati jemu .
SFX DP ati jemoj .
SFX DP ati jemoju .
SFX DP ati jemi .
SFX DP ati jeme .
SFX DP ati jemyh .
SFX DP ati jemym .
SFX DP ati jemymi .
SFX DP ti vši .
SFX DP ti všego .
SFX DP ti všemu .
SFX DP ti všim .
SFX DP ti všem .
SFX DP ti vših .
SFX DP ti všimi .
SFX DP ti vša .
SFX DP ti všu .
SFX DP ti všej .
SFX DP ti všeju .
SFX DP ti vše .
SFX DP ti ny .
SFX DP ti nogo .
SFX DP ti nomu .
SFX DP ti nym .
SFX DP ti nom .
SFX DP ti ni .
SFX DP ti ne .
SFX DP ti nyh .
SFX DP ti nymi .
SFX DP ti na .
SFX DP ti nu .
SFX DP ti noj .
SFX DP ti noju .
SFX DP ti no .
SFX DP ti nje/xPxE .
SFX DP ti nja/xPxE .
SFX DP ti nju/xPxE .
SFX DP ti njem/xPxE .
SFX DP ti nij/xPxE .
SFX DP ti njam/xPxE .
SFX DP ti njami/xPxE .
SFX DP ti njah/xPxE .

SFX DQ Y 15
SFX DQ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX DQ oš š/xPxE .
SFX DQ oš ši/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 i/xPxE .
SFX DQ oš šij/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 ij/xPxE .
SFX DQ oš šah/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX DQ oš šam/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 am/xPxE .
SFX DQ oš šju/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 ju/xPxE .
SFX DQ oš šami/xPxE .
SFX DQ 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX DR Y 9
SFX DR 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DR o o/xPxBxO .
SFX DR o a/xPxE .
SFX DR no on/xPxE .
SFX DR o u/xPxE .
SFX DR o ah/xPxE .
SFX DR o am/xPxE .
SFX DR 0 m/xPxE .
SFX DR o ami/xPxE .

SFX DS Y 80
SFX DS ti l .
SFX DS ti la .
SFX DS ti lo .
SFX DS ti li .
SFX DS vati ovu .
SFX DS vati ovem .
SFX DS vati oveš .
SFX DS vati ove .
SFX DS vati ovemo .
SFX DS vati ovete .
SFX DS vati ovut .
SFX DS ti h .
SFX DS ti še .
SFX DS ti hmo .
SFX DS ti ste .
SFX DS ti hu .
SFX DS vati ovi .
SFX DS vati ovimo .
SFX DS vati ovite .
SFX DS vati ovuči .
SFX DS vati ovučego .
SFX DS vati ovučemu .
SFX DS vati ovučim .
SFX DS vati ovučem .
SFX DS vati ovučih .
SFX DS vati ovučimi .
SFX DS vati ovuča .
SFX DS vati ovuču .
SFX DS vati ovučej .
SFX DS vati ovučeju .
SFX DS vati ovuče .
SFX DS vati ovemy .
SFX DS vati ovemogo .
SFX DS vati ovemomu .
SFX DS vati ovemym .
SFX DS vati ovemom .
SFX DS vati ovemo .
SFX DS vati ovema .
SFX DS vati ovemu .
SFX DS vati ovemoj .
SFX DS vati ovemoju .
SFX DS vati ovemi .
SFX DS vati oveme .
SFX DS vati ovemyh .
SFX DS vati ovemym .
SFX DS vati ovemymi .
SFX DS ti vši .
SFX DS ti všego .
SFX DS ti všemu .
SFX DS ti všim .
SFX DS ti všem .
SFX DS ti vših .
SFX DS ti všimi .
SFX DS ti vša .
SFX DS ti všu .
SFX DS ti všej .
SFX DS ti všeju .
SFX DS ti vše .
SFX DS ti ny .
SFX DS ti nogo .
SFX DS ti nomu .
SFX DS ti nym .
SFX DS ti nom .
SFX DS ti ni .
SFX DS ti ne .
SFX DS ti nyh .
SFX DS ti nymi .
SFX DS ti na .
SFX DS ti nu .
SFX DS ti noj .
SFX DS ti noju .
SFX DS ti no .
SFX DS ti nje/xPxE .
SFX DS ti nja/xPxE .
SFX DS ti nju/xPxE .
SFX DS ti njem/xPxE .
SFX DS ti nij/xPxE .
SFX DS ti njam/xPxE .
SFX DS ti njami/xPxE .
SFX DS ti njah/xPxE .

SFX DT Y 68
SFX DT ti l .
SFX DT ti la .
SFX DT ti lo .
SFX DT ti li .
SFX DT těti ču .
SFX DT ěti im .
SFX DT ěti iš .
SFX DT ěti i .
SFX DT ěti imo .
SFX DT ěti ite .
SFX DT ěti et .
SFX DT ti h .
SFX DT ti še .
SFX DT ti hmo .
SFX DT ti ste .
SFX DT ti hu .
SFX DT ěti eči .
SFX DT ěti eča .
SFX DT ěti eče .
SFX DT ěti imy .
SFX DT ěti imogo .
SFX DT ěti imomu .
SFX DT ěti imym .
SFX DT ěti imom .
SFX DT ěti imo .
SFX DT ěti ima .
SFX DT ěti imu .
SFX DT ěti imoj .
SFX DT ěti imoju .
SFX DT ěti imi .
SFX DT ěti ime .
SFX DT ěti imyh .
SFX DT ěti imym .
SFX DT ěti imymi .
SFX DT ti vši .
SFX DT ti všego .
SFX DT ti všemu .
SFX DT ti všim .
SFX DT ti všem .
SFX DT ti vših .
SFX DT ti všimi .
SFX DT ti vša .
SFX DT ti všu .
SFX DT ti všej .
SFX DT ti všeju .
SFX DT ti vše .
SFX DT ti ny .
SFX DT ti nogo .
SFX DT ti nomu .
SFX DT ti nym .
SFX DT ti nom .
SFX DT ti ni .
SFX DT ti ne .
SFX DT ti nyh .
SFX DT ti nymi .
SFX DT ti na .
SFX DT ti nu .
SFX DT ti noj .
SFX DT ti noju .
SFX DT ti no .
SFX DT ti nje/xPxE .
SFX DT ti nja/xPxE .
SFX DT ti nju/xPxE .
SFX DT ti njem/xPxE .
SFX DT ti nij/xPxE .
SFX DT ti njam/xPxE .
SFX DT ti njami/xPxE .
SFX DT ti njah/xPxE .

SFX DU Y 21
SFX DU 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX DU on n/xPxE .
SFX DU on ny/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 y/xPxE .
SFX DU on na/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 a/xPxE .
SFX DU on nov/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX DU on nu/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 u/xPxE .
SFX DU on nah/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX DU on nam/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 am/xPxE .
SFX DU on nom/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 om/xPxE .
SFX DU on nami/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX DU on ne/xPxE .
SFX DU 0 e/xPxE .

SFX DV Y 65
SFX DV ti u .
SFX DV ti em .
SFX DV ti eš .
SFX DV ti e .
SFX DV ti emo .
SFX DV ti ete .
SFX DV ti ut .
SFX DV ti eh .
SFX DV ti eše .
SFX DV ti ehmo .
SFX DV ti este .
SFX DV ti ehu .
SFX DV ti i .
SFX DV ti imo .
SFX DV ti ite .
SFX DV ti uči .
SFX DV ti učego .
SFX DV ti učemu .
SFX DV ti učim .
SFX DV ti učem .
SFX DV ti učih .
SFX DV ti učimi .
SFX DV ti uča .
SFX DV ti uču .
SFX DV ti učej .
SFX DV ti učeju .
SFX DV ti uče .
SFX DV ti omy .
SFX DV ti omogo .
SFX DV ti omomu .
SFX DV ti omym .
SFX DV ti omom .
SFX DV ti omo .
SFX DV ti oma .
SFX DV ti omu .
SFX DV ti omoj .
SFX DV ti omoju .
SFX DV ti omi .
SFX DV ti ome .
SFX DV ti omyh .
SFX DV ti omym .
SFX DV ti omymi .
SFX DV ti omo .
SFX DV ti eny .
SFX DV ti enogo .
SFX DV ti enomu .
SFX DV ti enym .
SFX DV ti enom .
SFX DV ti eni .
SFX DV ti ene .
SFX DV ti enyh .
SFX DV ti enymi .
SFX DV ti ena .
SFX DV ti enu .
SFX DV ti enoj .
SFX DV ti enoju .
SFX DV ti eno .
SFX DV ti enje/xPxE .
SFX DV ti enja/xPxE .
SFX DV ti enju/xPxE .
SFX DV ti enjem/xPxE .
SFX DV ti enij/xPxE .
SFX DV ti enjam/xPxE .
SFX DV ti enjami/xPxE .
SFX DV ti enjah/xPxE .

SFX DW Y 5
SFX DW 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DW 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX DW 0 a/xPxE .
SFX DW 0 u/xPxE .
SFX DW 0 em/xPxE .
