dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
brati/DN
krov/DO
poslati/DP
voš/DQ
okno/DR
zvati/DS
odletěti/DT
son/DU
idti/DV
januar/DW
fevruar/DW
brov/DO
vlakno/DR
nazvati/DS
poletěti/DT
pozvati/DS
potěti/DT
izbrati/DN
ljubov/DO
sozvati/DS
uletěti/DT
vozletěti/DT
izzvati/DS
izslati/DP
prězvati/DS
razbrati/DN
člověčnost/DW
crkov/DO
nabrati/DN
letěti/DT
odbrati/DN
prizvati/DS
slati/DP
vrtěti/DT
zabrati/DN
svekrov/DO
jatrov/DO
obletěti/DT
odslati/DP
odzvati/DS
razletěti/DT
razslati/DP
prati/DN
izprati/DN
prislati/DP
podbrati/DN
